fst/verb_paradigms.lexc
! Verb paradigm endings — STEM + ENDING decomposition.
! Bare stem on lower side from verb_stems.lexc, endings added here.

! 71 — īmtun (present) stem='imm'
LEXICON V71_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:amai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:atei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 71 — īmtun (preterite) stem='immi'
LEXICON V71_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:immi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:immi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:immi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:immi  # ;

! 72 — mestun (present) stem='mett'
LEXICON V72_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:amai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:atei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 72 — mestun (preterite) stem='metti'
LEXICON V72_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:metti  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:metti  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:metti  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:metti  # ;

! 73 — westun (present) stem='wedd'
LEXICON V73_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:amai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:atei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 73 — westun (preterite) stem='weddi'
LEXICON V73_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:weddi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:weddi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:weddi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:weddi  # ;

! 75 — lānktun (present) stem='lānk'
LEXICON V75_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:jamai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:jatei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:ja  # ;

! 75 — lānktun (preterite) stem='lānki'
LEXICON V75_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:lānki  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:lānki  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:lānki  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:lānki  # ;

! 76 — gnestun (present) stem='gnett'
LEXICON V76_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:ja  # ;

! 76 — gnestun (preterite) stem='gnetti'
LEXICON V76_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:gnetti  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:gnetti  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:gnetti  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:gnetti  # ;

! 77 — gēistun (present) stem='gēidja'
LEXICON V77_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:gēidja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:gēidja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:gēidja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:gēidja  # ;

! 77 — gēistun (preterite) stem='gēidi'
LEXICON V77_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:gēidi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:gēidi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:gēidi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:gēidi  # ;

! 78 — līztun (present) stem='lī'
LEXICON V78_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:ža  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:ža  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:ža  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:zimai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:zitei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:ža  # ;

! 78 — līztun (preterite) stem='līzi'
LEXICON V78_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:līzi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:līzi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:līzi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:līzi  # ;

! 79 — ōstun (present) stem='ō'
LEXICON V79_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:ša  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:autēnsja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:ša  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:autēnsja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:ša  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:autēnsja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:simai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Pl:autēnsjamai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:sitei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Pl:autēnsjatei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:ša  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:autēnsja  # ;

! 79 — ōstun (preterite) stem='ōsi'
LEXICON V79_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:ōsi  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Sg:autēnsi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:ōsi  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Sg:autēnsi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:ōsi  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Sg:autēnsi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Pl:autēnsimai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:autēnsitei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:ōsi  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P3+Pl:autēnsi  # ;

! 80b — glabtun (present) stem='glabb'
LEXICON V80b_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:ja  # ;

! 80b — glabtun (preterite) stem='glābi'
LEXICON V80b_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:glābi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:glābi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:glābi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:glābi  # ;

! 81 — wertun (present) stem='auwerrja'
LEXICON V81_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:auwerrja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:auwerrja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:auwerrja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:auwerrja  # ;

! 81 — wertun (preterite) stem='auw'
LEXICON V81_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:ēri  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:ēri  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:ēri  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:īrimai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:ēritei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:ēri  # ;

! 81a — weltun (present) stem='well'
LEXICON V81a_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 81a — weltun (preterite) stem='wīli'
LEXICON V81a_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:wīli  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:wīli  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:wīli  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:wīli  # ;

! 81b — drebtun (present) stem='drebb'
LEXICON V81b_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:ja  # ;

! 81b — drebtun (preterite) stem='drībi'
LEXICON V81b_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:drībi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:drībi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:drībi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:drībi  # ;

! 81c — dwestun (present) stem='dwe'
LEXICON V81c_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:šša  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:šša  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:šša  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:ssimai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:ssitei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:šša  # ;

! 81c — dwestun (preterite) stem='dwīsi'
LEXICON V81c_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:dwīsi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:dwīsi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:dwīsi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:dwīsi  # ;

! 82 — tirtun (present) stem='tirr'
LEXICON V82_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P1+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P2+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:e  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pres+P3+Pl:ja  # ;

! 82 — tirtun (preterite) stem='tīri'
LEXICON V82_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:tīri  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:tīri  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:tīri  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:tīri  # ;

! 82a — piltun (present) stem='pill'
LEXICON V82a_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 82a — piltun (preterite) stem='pīli'
LEXICON V82a_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:pīli  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:pīli  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:pīli  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:pīli  # ;

! 83 — dumtun (present) stem='dumja'
LEXICON V83_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:dumja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:dumja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:dumja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:dumja  # ;

! 83 — dumtun (preterite) stem='dūmi'
LEXICON V83_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:dūmi  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:dūmi  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:dūmi  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:dūmi  # ;

! 84 — justwei (present) stem='jāut'
LEXICON V84_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:ja  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:ja  # ;

! 84 — justwei (preterite) stem='jutta'
LEXICON V84_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:jutta  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:jutta  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:jutta  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:jutta  # ;

! 85 — treptun (present) stem='trepp'
LEXICON V85_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 85 — treptun (preterite) stem='trepp'
LEXICON V85_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 86 — kīrstun (present) stem='kīrt'
LEXICON V86_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 86 — kīrstun (preterite) stem='kīrta'
LEXICON V86_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:kīrta  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:kīrta  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:kīrta  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:kīratei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:kīrta  # ;

! 87 — bastun (present) stem='badd'
LEXICON V87_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 87 — bastun (preterite) stem='badda'
LEXICON V87_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:badda  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:badda  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:badda  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P1+Pl:baddimai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  @P.standard.twanksta@+Pret+P2+Pl:badditei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:badda  # ;

! 88 — kāistun (present) stem='kāis'
LEXICON V88_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 88 — kāistun (preterite) stem='kāisa'
LEXICON V88_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:kāisa  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:kāisa  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:kāisa  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:kāisa  # ;

! 89 — kaktwei (present) stem='līmp'
LEXICON V89_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 89 — kaktwei (preterite) stem='lippa'
LEXICON V89_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:lippa  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:lippa  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:lippa  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:lippa  # ;

! 91 — dustwei (present) stem='dūns'
LEXICON V91_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 91 — dustwei (preterite) stem='dussa'
LEXICON V91_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:dussa  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:dussa  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:dussa  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:dussa  # ;

! 92 — alktwei (present) stem='alkst'
LEXICON V92_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 92 — alktwei (preterite) stem='alka'
LEXICON V92_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:alka  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:alka  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:alka  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:alka  # ;

! 93 — prestun (present) stem='prest'
LEXICON V93_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 93 — prestun (preterite) stem='pretta'
LEXICON V93_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:pretta  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:pretta  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:pretta  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:pretta  # ;

! 94 — līstun (present) stem='lāis'
LEXICON V94_pres
  +Pres+P1+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Sg:a  # ;
  +Pres+P1+Pl:imai  # ;
  +Pres+P2+Pl:itei  # ;
  +Pres+P3+Pl:a  # ;

! 94 — līstun (preterite) stem='lissa'
LEXICON V94_pret
  +Pret+P1+Sg:lissa  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Sg:lissa  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Sg:lissa  # ;
  +Pret+P1+Pl:mai  # ;
  +Pret+P2+Pl:tei  # ;
  +Pret+P3+Pl:lissa  # ;
